Washington statutes.
RCW 39.46.010

Purposes—Liberal construction.

The purposes of this chapter are to permit the state and local governments to conform with registration requirements of federal law which are necessary to exempt interest payments from federal income taxes when the state or local governments issue bonds or incur other obligations and to authorize the establishment and maintenance of differing systems of registering bonds and other obligations as these systems are developed and recognized, which may be instituted, discontinued, and reinstituted from time to time. It is further the purpose of this chapter to grant local governments an alternative flexible authority to structure and sell their bond issues and to include a variety of features on their bonds.

This act shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

[ 1983 c 167 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 167: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1983 c 167 s 273.]